Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-220
Violation; penalty.

Any person, firm, corporation, or their agents that violate any provision of the Barber Act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 17, p. 434;

Laws 1929, c. 154, § 9, p. 538;

C.S.1929, § 71-2021;

R.S.1943, § 71-220;

Laws 1957, c. 294, § 8, p. 1057;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 23;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 147;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 24.

Under former law section prescribed no penalty for cutting hair without a haircutters' certificate of registration as required by former section 71-203. Lane v. State, 120 Neb. 302, 232 N.W. 96 (1930).